Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 1. In General
§ 34-1-143.
Information to be furnished to department of revenue and the state board of equalization.

The county clerk shall place the recording data on the statement of consideration paid and deliver the statement to the county assessor. The county assessor shall furnish information from the statements of consideration to the state board of equalization and department of revenue as the board or department shall require, and when disclosed under W.S. 34-1-142(g) and 39-13-109(b)(i), any person or his agent wishing to review or contest his property tax assessment or valuation and the county board of equalization. The county assessor may furnish information from the statements of consideration to a county assessor in another county in this state to be used as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 170, § 1; 1995, ch. 209, § 1; 1996, ch. 92, § 1; 1997, ch. 147, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; ch. 23, § 1.

Construction. —

This section does not independently provide for the release of information to taxpayers but instead relies on the provisions of the other statutes to determine when information should be available. Bender v. Decaria, 998 P.2d 953,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 34-1-144.
Penalty for falsifying statement.

It is a misdemeanor for a person to willfully falsify or publicly disclose, except as specifically authorized by law, any information on the statement of consideration required by W.S.

34-1-142

and

34-1-143

. Upon conviction the offender is subject to a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 170, § 1; 1996, ch. 92, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

§ 34-1-145.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

34-1-145

through

34-1-150

:

“Beneficiary” means the record owner of the beneficiary’s interest under a trust deed, including successors in interest;

“Mortgage” means as described in W.S.

34-2-107

;

“Mortgagee” means the record owner of the mortgagee’s interest under a mortgage, including a successor in interest;

“Satisfactory evidence of the full payment of the obligation secured by a trust deed or mortgage” means the original cancelled check or a copy of a cancelled check, showing all endorsements, payable to the beneficiary, servicer or mortgagee and reasonable documentary evidence that the check was to effect full payment under the trust deed or an encumbrance upon the property covered by the trust deed or mortgage;

“Servicer” means a person or entity that collects loan payments on behalf of a beneficiary or mortgagee;

“Title agent” means a title insurance agent licensed as an organization under W.S.

26-23-316

and bonded as a title abstractor under W.S.

26-23-308

or

33-2-101

;

“Title insurer” means a title insurer authorized to conduct business in the state under the Wyoming Insurance Code;

“Trust deed” means as described in W.S.

34-3-101

.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 84, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-1-146.
Reconveyance of trust deed or release of mortgage; procedures; forms.

A title insurer or title agent may reconvey a trust deed or release a mortgage in accordance with the provisions of subsections (b) through (f) of this section if:

The obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has been fully paid by the title insurer or title agent; or

The title insurer or title agent possesses satisfactory evidence of the full payment of the obligation secured by a trust deed or mortgage.

A title insurer or title agent may reconvey a trust deed or release a mortgage under subsection (a) of this section regardless of whether the title insurer or title agent is named as a trustee under a trust deed or has the authority to release a mortgage.

No sooner than thirty (30) days after payment in full of the obligation secured by a trust deed or mortgage, and after notice is given pursuant to W.S.

34-1-132

, the title insurer or title agent shall deliver to the beneficiary, mortgagee or servicer, or send by certified mail to the beneficiary, mortgagee or servicer, at the address specified in the trust deed or mortgage or at any address for the beneficiary or mortgagee specified in the last recorded assignment of the trust deed or mortgage a notice of intent to release or reconvey and a copy of the release or reconveyance to be recorded as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section.

The notice of intent to release or reconvey shall contain the name of the beneficiary or mortgagee and the servicer if loan payments on the trust deed or mortgage are collected by a servicer, the name of the title insurer or title agent, the date and be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF INTENT TO RELEASE OR RECONVEY Notice is hereby given to you as follows:1. This notice concerns the (trust deed or mortgage) described as follows:(Trustor or Mortgagor): (Beneficiary or Mortgagee): Recording Information: Book Number: Page Number: 2. The undersigned claims to have paid in full or possesses satisfactory evidence of the full payment of the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage described above.3. The undersigned will fully release the mortgage or reconvey the trust deed described in this notice unless, within thirty (30) days from the date stated on this notice, the undersigned has received by certified mail a notice stating that the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has not been paid in full or that you otherwise object to the release of the mortgage or the reconveyance of the trust deed. Notice shall be mailed to the address stated on this form.4. A copy of the (release of mortgage or reconveyance of trust deed) is enclosed with this notice. (Signature of title insurer or title agent) (Address of title insurer or title agent)

Click to view

If, within thirty (30) days from the day on which the title insurer or title agent delivered or mailed the notice of intent to release or reconvey in accordance with subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the beneficiary, mortgagee or servicer does not send by certified mail to the title insurer or title agent a notice that the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has not been paid in full or that the beneficiary, mortgagee or servicer objects to the release of the mortgage or reconveyance of the trust deed, the title insurer or title agent may execute, acknowledge and record a reconveyance of a trust deed or release of a mortgage:

A reconveyance of a trust deed under this subsection shall be in substantially the following form:

RECONVEYANCE OF TRUST DEED (Name of title insurer or title agent), a (title insurer or title agent) authorized to conduct business in the state does hereby reconvey, without warranty, the following trust property located in County, state of Wyoming, that is covered by a trust deed naming (name of trustor) as trustor, and (name of beneficiary) as beneficiary and was recorded on , (year), as document number , or, if applicable, in Book at Page , (insert a description of the trust property): The undersigned title insurer or title agent certifies as follows:1. The undersigned title insurer or title agent has fully paid the obligation secured by the trust deed or possesses satisfactory evidence of the full payment of the obligation secured by the trust deed.2. No sooner than thirty (30) days after payment in full of the obligation secured by the trust deed, the title insurer or title agent delivered or sent by certified mail to the beneficiary or servicer at the address specified in the trust deed and at any address for the beneficiary specified in the last recorded assignment of the trust deed, a notice of intent to release or reconvey and a copy of the reconveyance.3. The title insurer or title agent did not receive, within thirty (30) days from the day on which the title insurer or title agent delivered or mailed the notice of intent to release or reconvey, a notice from the beneficiary or servicer sent by certified mail that the obligation secured by the trust deed has not been paid in full or that the beneficiary or servicer objects to the reconveyance of the trust deed. (Notarization) (Signature of title insurer or title agent)

Click to view

A release of a mortgage under this subsection shall be in substantially the following form:

RELEASE OF MORTGAGE (Name of title insurer or title agent), a (title insurer or title agent) authorized to conduct business in the state does hereby release the mortgage on the following property located in County, state of Wyoming, that is covered by a mortgage naming (name of mortgagor) as mortgagor, and (name of mortgagee) as mortgagee and was recorded on , (year), as document number , or, if applicable, in Book at Page, (insert a description of the trust property): The undersigned title insurer or title agent certifies as follows:1. The undersigned title insurer or title agent has fully paid the obligation secured by the mortgage or possesses satisfactory evidence of the full payment of the obligation secured by the mortgage.2. No sooner than thirty (30) days after payment in full of the obligation secured by the mortgage, the title insurer or title agent delivered to the mortgagee or sent by certified mail to the mortgagee or servicer at the address specified in the mortgage and at any address for the mortgagee specified in the last recorded assignment of the mortgage, a notice of intent to release or reconvey and a copy of the release.3. The title insurer or title agent did not receive, within thirty (30) days from the day on which the title insurer or title agent delivered or mailed the notice of intent to release or reconvey, a notice from the mortgagee or servicer sent by certified mail that the obligation secured by the mortgage has not been paid in full or that the mortgagee or servicer objects to the release of the mortgage. (Notarization) (Signature of title insurer or title agent)

Click to view

A release of mortgage or reconveyance of trust deed that is executed and notarized in accordance with paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection is entitled to recordation in accordance with W.S.

34-1-119

and

34-1-130

. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a reconveyance of a trust deed or release of a mortgage that is recorded under this paragraph is valid regardless of any deficiency in the release or reconveyance procedure. If the title insurer’s or title agent’s signature on a release of mortgage or reconveyance of trust deed recorded under this paragraph is forged, the release of mortgage or reconveyance of trust deed is void.

A release of mortgage or reconveyance of trust deed under this section does not discharge an obligation that was secured by the trust deed or mortgage at the time the trust deed was reconveyed or the mortgage was released.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 84, § 1.

§ 34-1-147.
Objections to reconveyance or release.

A title insurer or title agent may not record a reconveyance of trust deed or release of mortgage if, within thirty (30) days from the day on which the title insurer or title agent delivered or mailed the notice of intent to release or reconvey in accordance with W.S. 34-1-146(c) and (d), the beneficiary, mortgagee or servicer sends a notice by certified mail that the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has not been paid in full or objects to the release of the mortgage or reconveyance of the trust deed under W.S. 34-1-146(e).

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 84, § 1.

§ 34-1-148.
Liability of title insurer or title agent.

A title insurer or title agent purporting to act under the provisions of W.S.

34-1-146

who reconveys a trust deed or releases a mortgage is liable for the damages suffered as a result of the reconveyance if the obligation secured by the trust deed or mortgage has not been fully paid and:

The title insurer or title agent failed to comply with the provisions of W.S.

34-1-146

and

34-1-147

; or

The title insurer or title agent acted with gross negligence or in bad faith in reconveying the trust deed.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 84, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-1-149.
Application of provisions.

The provisions of W.S.

34-1-145

through

34-1-148

apply to any obligation secured by a trust deed or mortgage that was paid prior to, on or after July 1, 1999.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 84, § 1.

§ 34-1-150.
Other sections not affected.

W.S.

34-1-145

through

34-1-149

do not excuse a beneficiary, mortgagee, trustee, secured lender or servicer from complying with the provisions of W.S.

34-1-132

.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 84, § 1.

§ 34-1-151.
Property disclosure statement.

Unless disclosure is waived as provided in subsection (b) of this section, every seller of vacant land shall provide to any prospective buyer a property disclosure statement that includes, but is not limited to, the following information:

Whether the property is being offered as a unified estate;

If fee ownership of the underlying mineral estate has in any way been severed in the chain of title from the surface estate;

The availability and location of public utilities;

The name of the entity that maintains the roads and the level of maintenance available;

The availability of water and sewer infrastructure;

The availability of fire protection services; and

The existence and location of any easements across the land known to the seller or recorded in the records of the county clerk.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 45, § 2.

A buyer may waive disclosure of the information required under subsections (a) and (e) of this section.

No transfer subject to this section shall be invalidated solely because of the failure to comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. However, any person who willfully or negligently violates or fails to perform the duties prescribed by subsection (a) of this section shall be liable in the amount of actual damages suffered by the buyer.

For purposes of this section, “vacant land” means land:

With no habitable dwelling;

Not within the boundaries of a platted subdivision, or city or town; and

Less than one hundred forty (140) acres.

Unless disclosure is waived as provided in subsection (b) of this section, every seller of land not within the corporate boundaries of any city or town shall disclose in writing to any prospective buyer whether fee ownership of the wind estate has in any way been severed in the chain of title from the surface estate, including the existence of a wind energy agreement as defined in W.S. 34-27-102(a)(i).

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 206, § 1; 2011, ch. 124, § 1; ch. 166, § 1; 2012, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 124, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, added (d).

The second amendment, by Laws 2011, ch. 166, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(viii); and made related changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “Unless disclosure is waived” for “Except” in the introductory language of (a); repealed former (a)(viii) which read: “If fee ownership of the wind estate has in any way been severed in the chain of title from the surface estate”; substituted “subsections (a) and (e)” for “subsection (a)” in (b); and added (e).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 206, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 34-1-152.
Ownership of pore space underlying surfaces.

The ownership of all pore space in all strata below the surface lands and waters of this state is declared to be vested in the several owners of the surface above the strata.

A conveyance of the surface ownership of real property shall be a conveyance of the pore space in all strata below the surface of such real property unless the ownership interest in such pore space previously has been severed from the surface ownership or is explicitly excluded in the conveyance. The ownership of pore space in strata may be conveyed in the manner provided by law for the transfer of mineral interests in real property. No agreement conveying mineral or other interests underlying the surface shall act to convey ownership of any pore space in the stratum unless the agreement explicitly conveys that ownership interest.

No provision of law, including a lawfully adopted rule or regulation, requiring notice to be given to a surface owner, to an owner of the mineral interest, or to both, shall be construed to require notice to persons holding ownership interest in any pore space in the underlying strata unless the law specifies notice to such persons is required.

As used in this section, the term “pore space” is defined to mean subsurface space which can be used as storage space for carbon dioxide or other substances.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to change or alter the common law as of July 1, 2008, as it relates to the rights belonging to, or the dominance of, the mineral estate. For the purpose of determining the priority of subsurface uses between a severed mineral estate and pore space as defined in subsection (d) of this section, the severed mineral estate is dominant regardless of whether ownership of the pore space is vested in the several owners of the surface or is owned separately from the surface.

All instruments which transfer the rights to pore space under this section shall describe the scope of any right to use the surface estate. The owner of any pore space right shall have no right to use the surface estate beyond that set out in a properly recorded instrument.

Transfers of pore space rights made after July 1, 2008 are null and void at the option of the owner of the surface estate if the transfer instrument does not contain a specific description of the location of the pore space being transferred. The description may include but is not limited to a subsurface geologic or seismic survey or a metes and bounds description of the surface lying over the transferred pore space. In the event a description of the surface is used, the transfer shall be deemed to include pore space at all depths underlying the described surface area unless specifically excluded. The validity of pore space rights under this subsection shall not affect the respective liabilities of any party and such liabilities shall operate in the same manner as if the pore space transfer were valid.

Nothing in this section shall alter, amend, diminish or invalidate rights to the use of subsurface pore space that were acquired by contract or lease prior to July 1, 2008.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 29, § 1; 2009, ch. 49, § 1; ch. 169, § 1.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, added the second sentence of (e).

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 1, substituted “under this subsection” for “under this paragraph” in the last sentence of (g).

Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 5(b), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2009.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2008, ch. 29, §
3, provides:

“It is the intent of the legislature to clarify the ownership of pore space underlying the surface of the lands and waters of this state. All conveyances of interests in real property on and after July 1, 2008 shall be subject to the provisions of this act. All conveyances of real property made prior to July 1, 2008 shall be construed in accordance with the provisions of this act unless a person claiming an ownership interest contrary to the provisions of this act establishes such ownership by a preponderance of the evidence in an action to establish ownership of such interest.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 29, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 34-1-153.
Ownership of material injected into geologic sequestration sites; liability for holding interests related to a sequestration site or giving consent to allow geologic sequestration activities.

All carbon dioxide, and other substances injected incidental to the injection of carbon dioxide, injected into any geologic sequestration site for the purpose of geologic sequestration shall be presumed to be owned by the injector of such material and all rights, benefits, burdens and liabilities of such ownership shall belong to the injector. This presumption may be rebutted by a person claiming contrary ownership by a preponderance of the evidence in an action to establish ownership.

No owner of pore space, other person holding any right to control pore space or other surface or subsurface interest holder, shall be liable for the effects of injecting carbon dioxide for geologic sequestration purposes, or for the effects of injecting other substances for the purpose of geologic sequestration which substances are injected incidental to the injection of carbon dioxide, solely by virtue of their interest or by their having given consent to the injection.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 50, § 1.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, added “subject to W.S.

35-11-318

and

35-11-319

” in the first sentence of (a); in (b), added “Except as provided in W.S.

35-11-318

and

35-11-319

,” at the beginning and made a related change.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 50, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2009

§ 34-1-153.
Ownership of material injected into geologic sequestration sites; liability for holding interests related to a sequestration site or giving consent to allow geologic sequestration activities. [Effective July 1, 2023]

All carbon dioxide, and other substances injected incidental to the injection of carbon dioxide, injected into any geologic sequestration site for the purpose of geologic sequestration shall be presumed to be owned by the injector of such material subject to W.S.

35-11-318

and

35-11-319

and all rights, benefits, burdens and liabilities of such ownership shall belong to the injector. This presumption may be rebutted by a person claiming contrary ownership by a preponderance of the evidence in an action to establish ownership.

Except as provided in W.S.

35-11-318

and

35-11-319

, no owner of pore space, other person holding any right to control pore space or other surface or subsurface interest holder, shall be liable for the effects of injecting carbon dioxide for geologic sequestration purposes, or for the effects of injecting other substances for the purpose of geologic sequestration which substances are injected incidental to the injection of carbon dioxide, solely by virtue of their interest or by their having given consent to the injection.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 50, § 1; 2022 ch. 101, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.

§ 34-1-154.
Removal of restrictive covenants in violation of law.

Any person who holds an ownership interest of record in real property in this state, or any attorney, title insurance company or title insurance agent authorized to do business in this state and acting on behalf of a person with an ownership interest in real property in this state, may record a new instrument to remove any restrictive covenant contained in any conveyance encumbering or otherwise affecting the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, real property that:

Is held to be void and unenforceable by a final determination of the supreme court of Wyoming or the supreme court of the United States of America; or

Is in violation of the acts prohibited by W.S.

40-26-103

through

40-26-109

.

Except as provided in W.S.

34-1-156

, any person who, in good faith, delivers or records any instrument pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be immune from civil liability. The immunity provided in this subsection shall not be available to any person who:

Represents or attempts to represent that the restrictive covenants pertaining to paragraphs (a)(i) or (ii) of this section, which are void and unenforceable or prohibited by law, are valid and enforceable; or

Honors or exercises or attempts to honor or exercise restrictive covenants pertaining to paragraphs (a)(i) or (ii) of this section, which are void and unenforceable or prohibited by law.

History.

2021 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 34-1-155.
Process for removing restrictive covenants in violation of law.

In accordance with W.S.

34-1-154

, a new instrument removing a restrictive covenant that is in violation of law may be recorded by filing the new instrument with the county clerk for the county in which the real property is located.

A new instrument filed and recorded under this section shall contain all of the following:

The title of the filed and recorded prior instrument to which the new instrument pertains;

The name and mailing address of the person filing and recording the new instrument;

The name and mailing address of any owner of record of the real property on whose behalf the new instrument is being filed;

The legal description of the real property subject to the provisions in violation of law as specified in W.S. 34-1-154(a);

A clear reference to the provisions in the prior instrument that are in violation of law as specified in W.S. 34-1-154(a) and have been stricken from the new instrument.

Upon receiving a new instrument that complies with the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, the county clerk for the county in which the real property is located shall file and record the new instrument.

History.

2021 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 34-1-156.
Civil action for removing enforceable covenants.

Any person whose real property is subject to, or is benefitted by, a restrictive covenant that was removed under W.S.

34-1-155

and who believes the restrictive covenant is valid, may petition the court having jurisdiction over the property. The petition shall state the grounds upon which relief is requested, and shall be supported by the affidavit of the petitioner or his attorney setting forth a concise statement of the facts upon which the petition is based. The clerk of court shall assign a case number to the petition and obtain from the petitioner a filing fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00). Upon the filing of the petition the following shall apply:

The court may enter its order, which may be granted ex parte, directing the person who filed and recorded the instrument to appear before the court at a time no earlier than six (6) nor later than fifteen (15) days following the date of service of the petition, and order the person to show cause, if any, why the relief provided in this subsection should not be granted. Service under this section shall be made in accordance with the rules of civil procedure;

If, following a hearing on the matter the court determines that the restrictive covenant under subsection (a) of this section is valid and enforceable, the court shall issue an order so stating and awarding damages of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) as determined by the court or actual damages, whichever is greater, costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the petitioner to be paid by the person who filed and recorded the instrument;

If the court determines that the restrictive covenant is void and unenforceable, the court shall issue an order so stating and shall award costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the person who filed and recorded the instrument to be paid by the petitioner.

History.

2021 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 34-1-157.
Ownership of fossils and artifacts.

The ownership of any fossil, artifact or non-fossilized animal remains discovered in the strata below the surface lands and waters of the state is vested in the owner of the surface estate, unless otherwise governed by W.S.

7-4-106

.

When used in any instrument, the term “minerals” does not include fossils, artifacts or non-fossilized animal remains.

As used in this section:

“Fossil” means any fossilized remains, traces or imprints of organisms, preserved in or on the earth’s crust, that are of paleontological interest and that provide information about the history of life on earth, but does not include coal, oil, gas or other hydrocarbons;

“Artifact” means any material remains of past human life or human activities that are of archaeological interest.

History.

2021 ch. 75, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 75, § 2, provides: “This act shall apply to any existing or future transfer of ownership of the strata below the surface lands and waters of the state.”

Editor's Note. —

This section was redesignated as §

34-1-157

, at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 75, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.